Hawaii statutes.
§460J-9 Application; fees. (a) Every
applicant for a license under this chapter shall file an application on forms
prescribed or required by the board, and shall furnish any additional
information bearing upon the issuance of the license as the board requires.
Every application shall be accompanied by the application and examination
fees. In the case of a partnership, joint venture, or corporation, any
licensed member or officer therefor may sign the application on behalf of the
applicant and every application shall be accompanied by the application and
license fees. In the case of a proprietorship, every application shall be
accompanied by the application and license fees.

(b) Every application for a license by an
individual who passed the examination shall be accompanied by a license fee. [L
1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1984, c 7, §§59, 60; am L 1986, c 126, §4; am L
1987, c 143, §3; am L 1992, c 202, §131; am L 1997, c 40, §16]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next